Massachusetts, session 194th, S45.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. The General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, are hereby
2 amended by inserting after chapter 93L the following chapter:
3 Chapter 93M. Massachusetts Data Privacy Act
4 Section 1. Definitions
5 (a) As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
6 requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
7 (1) “authentication”, the process of verifying an individual or entity for security
8 purposes.
1 of 64

9 (2) “biometric data”, data generated from the technological processing of an
10 individual’s unique biological, physical, or physiological characteristics that is linked or
11 reasonably linkable to an individual, including but not limited to retina or iris scans, fingerprint,
12 voiceprint, map or scan of hand or face geometry, vein pattern, gait pattern; provided, however,
13 that “biometric information” shall not include:
14 (i) a digital or physical photograph;
15 (ii) an audio or video recording; or
16 (iii) data generated from a digital or physical photograph, or an audio or video
17 recording, unless such data is generated to identify a specific individual.
18 (3) "chapter”, this chapter of the General Laws, as from time to time may be
19 amended, and any regulations promulgated under said chapter.
20 (4) “collect” and “collection”, buying, renting, licensing, gathering, obtaining,
21 receiving, accessing, or otherwise acquiring covered data by any means. This includes receiving
22 information from the consumer either actively, through interactions such as user registration, or
23 passively, by observing the consumer’s behavior.
24 (5) “consent”, a clear affirmative act signifying an individual’s freely given, specific,
25 informed, and unambiguous agreement to allow the processing of specific categories of personal
26 information relating to the individual for a narrowly defined particular purpose after having been
27 informed, in response to a specific request from a covered entity that meets the requirements of
28 this chapter; provided, however, that “consent” may include a written statement, including a
2 of 64

29 statement written by electronic means, or any other unambiguous affirmative action; and
30 provided further, that the following shall not constitute “consent”:
31 (i) acceptance of a general or broad terms of use or similar document that contains
32 descriptions of personal information processing along with other, unrelated information;
33 (ii) hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of content; or
34 (iii) agreement obtained through dark patterns or a false, fictitious, fraudulent, or
35 materially misleading statement or representation.
36 (6) “control”, with respect to an entity:
37 (i) ownership of, or the power to vote, more than 50 percent of the outstanding shares
38 of any class of voting security of the entity;
39 (ii) control over the election of a majority of the directors of the entity (or of
40 individuals exercising similar functions); or
41 (iii) the power to exercise a controlling influence over the management of the entity.
42 (7) “covered data”, information, including derived data, inferences, and unique
43 persistent identifiers, that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in combination
44 with other information, to an individual or a device that identifies or is linked or reasonably
45 linkable to an individual. However, the term “covered data” does not include de-identified data
46 or publicly available information.
3 of 64

47 (8) “covered entity”, any entity or any person, other than an individual acting in a
48 non-commercial context, that alone or jointly with others determines the purposes and means of
49 collecting, processing, or transferring covered data.
50 The term “covered entity” does not include:
51 (i) government agencies or service providers to government agencies that exclusively
52 and solely process information provided by government entities;
53 (ii) any entity or person that meets the following criteria for the period of the 3
54 preceding calendar years (or for the period during which the covered entity or service provider
55 has been in existence if such period is less than 3 years):
56 (A) the entity or person’s average annual gross revenues during the period did not
57 exceed $20,000,000;
58 (B) the entity or person, on average, did not annually collect or process the covered
59 data of more than 25,000 individuals during the period, other than for the purpose of initiating,
60 rendering, billing for, finalizing, completing, or otherwise collecting payment for a requested
61 service or product, so long as all covered data for such purpose was deleted or de-identified
62 within 90 days, except when necessary to investigate fraud or as consistent with a covered
63 entity’s return policy; and
64 (C) no component of its revenue comes from transferring covered data during any
65 year (or part of a year if the covered entity has been in existence for less than 1 year) that occurs
66 during the period.
4 of 64

67 (iii) a national securities association that is registered under 15 U.S.C. 78o-3 of the
68 Securities Exchange Act of 1934.and is operating solely for purposes under that act.
69 (iv) a nonprofit organization that is established to detect and prevent fraudulent acts in
70 connection with insurance and is operating solely for that purpose.
71 (9) “covered high-impact social media company”, a covered entity that provides any
72 internet-accessible platform where:
73 (i) such covered entity generates $3,000,000,000 or more in annual revenue;
74 (ii) such platform has 300,000,000 or more monthly active users for not fewer than 3
75 of the preceding 12 months on the online product or service of such covered entity; and
76 (iii) such platform constitutes an online product or service that is primarily used by
77 users to access or share user-generated content.
78 (10) “dark pattern or deceptive design”, a user interface that is designed, modified, or
79 manipulated with the purpose or substantial effect of obscuring, subverting, or impairing a
80 reasonable individual’s autonomy, decision-making, or choice, including, but not limited to, any
81 practice the Federal Trade Commission refers to as a “dark pattern.”
82 (11) “data broker”, a covered entity whose principal source of revenue is derived from
83 processing or transferring covered data that the covered entity did not collect directly from the
84 individuals linked or linkable to the covered data. This term does not include a covered entity
85 insofar as such entity processes employee data collected by and received from a third party
86 concerning any individual who is an employee of the third party for the sole purpose of such
5 of 64

87 third-party providing benefits to the employee. An entity may not be considered to be a data
88 broker for purposes of this chapter if the entity is acting as a service provider.
89 (12) “de-identified data”, information that does not identify and is not linked or
90 reasonably linkable to a distinct individual or a device, regardless of whether the information is
91 aggregated, and if the covered entity or service provider:
92 (i) takes technical measures to ensure that the information cannot, at any point, be
93 used to re-identify any individual or device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to
94 an individual;
95 (ii) publicly commits in a clear and conspicuous manner:
96 (A) to process and transfer the information solely in a de-identified form without any
97 reasonable means for re-identification; and
98 (B) to not attempt to re-identify the information with any individual or device that
99 identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to an individual; and
100 (iii) contractually obligates any person or entity that receives the information from the
101 covered entity or service provider:
102 (A) to comply with all the provisions of this paragraph with respect to the
103 information; and
104 (B) to require that such contractual obligations be included contractually in all
105 subsequent instances for which the data may be received.
6 of 64

106 (13) “derived data”, covered data that is created by the derivation of information, data,
107 assumptions, correlations, inferences, predictions, or conclusions from facts, evidence, or another
108 source of information or data about an individual or an individual’s device.
109 (14) “device”, any electronic equipment capable of collecting, processing, or
110 transferring data that is used by one or more individuals or households.
111 (15) “genetic information”, any covered data, regardless of its format, that concerns an
112 individual’s genetic characteristics, including but not limited to:
113 (i) raw sequence data that results from the sequencing of the complete, or a portion
114 of the, extracted deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) of an individual; or
115 (ii) genotypic and phenotypic information that results from analyzing raw sequence
116 data described in subparagraph (i).
117 (16) “homepage”, the introductory page of an internet website and any internet web
118 page where personal information is collected; provided, however, that in the case of an online
119 service, such as a mobile application, “homepage” shall include:
120 (i) the application’s platform page or download page;
121 (ii) a link within the application, such as from the application configuration, “About,”
122 “Information,” or settings page; and
123 (iii) any other location that allows individuals to review the notices required by this
124 chapter, including, but not limited to, before downloading the application.
7 of 64

125 (17) “individual”, a natural person who is a Massachusetts resident or is present in
126 Massachusetts.
127 (18) “knowledge”,
128 (i)with respect to a covered entity that is a covered high-impact social media company,
129 the entity knew or should have known the individual was a minor;
130 (ii)with respect to a covered entity or service provider that is a large data holder, and
131 otherwise is not a covered high-impact social media company, that the covered entity knew or
132 acted in willful disregard of the fact that the individual was a minor; and
133 (iii)with respect to a covered entity or service provider that does not meet the
134 requirements of clause (i) or (ii), actual knowledge.
135 (19) “large data holder”, a covered entity or service provider that in the most recent
136 calendar year:
137 (i)had annual gross revenues of $200,000,000 or more; and
138 (ii)collected, processed, or transferred the covered data of more than 2,000,000
139 individuals or devices that identify or are linked or reasonably linkable to one or more
140 individuals, excluding covered data collected and processed solely for the purpose of initiating,
141 rendering, billing for, finalizing, completing, or otherwise collecting payment for a requested
142 product or service; or the sensitive covered data of more than 200,000 individuals or devices that
143 identify or are linked or reasonably linkable to one or more individuals.
144 The term “large data holder” does not include any instance in which the covered entity or
145 service provider would qualify as a large data holder solely on the basis of collecting or
8 of 64

146 processing personal email addresses, personal telephone numbers, or log-in information of an
147 individual or device to allow the individual or device to log in to an account administered by the
148 covered entity or service provider.
149 (20) “material”, with respect to an act, practice, or representation of a covered entity
150 (including a representation made by the covered entity in a privacy policy or similar disclosure to
151 individuals) involving the collection, processing, or transfer of covered data, that such act,
152 practice, or representation is likely to affect a reasonable individual’s decision or conduct
153 regarding a product or service
154 (21) “minor”, an individual under the age of 18.
155 (22) “OCABR”, the Office of Consumer Affairs and Business Regulation.
156 (23) “precise geolocation information,” information derived from a device or from
157 interactions between devices, with or without the knowledge of the user and regardless of the
158 technological method used, that pertains to or directly or indirectly reveals the present or past
159 geographical location of an individual or device within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts
160 with sufficient precision to identify street-level location information within a range of 1,850 feet
161 or less.
162 (24) “process”, any operation or set of operations performed on information or on sets
163 of information, whether or not by automated means, including but not limited to the use, storage,
164 analysis, deletion, or modification of information.
165 (25) “processing purpose”, a reason for which a covered entity or service provider
166 collects, processes, or transfers covered data that is specific and granular enough for a reasonable
9 of 64

167 individual to understand the material facts of how and why the covered entity or service provider
168 collects, processes, or transfers the covered data.
169 (26) "profiling", any form of automated processing performed on personal data to
170 evaluate, analyze or predict personal aspects related to an identified or identifiable individual's
171 economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location or
172 movements.
173 (27) “publicly available information”, any information that a covered entity or service
174 provider has a reasonable basis to believe has been lawfully made available to the general public
175 from:
176 (i) federal, state, or local government records, if the covered entity collects,
177 processes, and transfers such information in accordance with any restrictions or terms of use
178 placed on the information by the relevant government entity;
179 (ii) widely distributed media;
180 (iii) a website or online service made available to all members of the public, for free or
181 for a fee, including where all members of the public, for free or for a fee, can log in to the
182 website or online service;
183 (iv) a disclosure that has been made to the general public as required by federal, state,
184 or local law; or
185 (v) the visual observation of the physical presence of an individual or a device in a
186 public place, not including data collected by a device in the individual’s possession.
10 of 64

187 For purposes of this paragraph, information from a website or online service is not
188 available to all members of the public if the individual who made the information available via
189 the website or online service has either restricted the information to a specific audience or
190 reasonably expects that the information will not be distributed to so many persons as to become a
191 matter of public knowledge.
192 The term “publicly available information” does not include:
193 (i) any obscene visual depiction, as defined in 18 U.S.C. section 1460;
194 (ii) any inference made exclusively from multiple independent sources of publicly
195 available information that reveals sensitive covered data with respect to an individual;
196 (iii) biometric information;
197 (iv) publicly available information that has been combined with covered data;
198 (v) genetic information, unless otherwise made available by the individual to whom
199 the information pertains:
200 (vi) intimate images known to have been created or shared without consent.
201 (28) “reasonably understandable”, of length and complexity such that an individual
202 with an eighth-grade reading level, as established by the department of elementary and secondary
203 education, can read and comprehend.
204 (29) “sensitive covered data”, a form of coved data, including:
205 (i) an individual’s precise geolocation information;
11 of 64

206 (ii) biometric or genetic information;
207 (iii) the covered data of an individual when a covered entity or service provider has
208 knowledge the individual is a minor;
209 (iv) covered data that reveals an individual’s:
210 (A) race, color, ethnicity, or national origin;
211 (B) sex or gender identity;
212 (C) religious beliefs;
213 (D) citizenship or immigration status;
214 (E) military service; or
215 (F) status as a victim of a crime.
216 (v) covered data processed concerning an individual’s past, present or future mental
217 or physical health condition, disability, diagnosis or treatment, including pregnancy and cosmetic
218 treatment;
219 (vi) covered data processed concerning an individual’s sexual orientation, sex life or
220 reproductive health, including, but not limited to, the use or purchase of contraceptives, birth
221 control, abortifacients or other medication, products or services related to reproductive health;
222 (vii) covered data that reveals an individual’s philosophical beliefs or union
223 membership;
12 of 64

224 (viii) covered data that reveals an individual’s government-issued identifier, including
225 but not limited to, social security number, driver’s license number, military identification
226 number, passport number or state-issued identification card number but does not include a
227 government-issued identifier required by law to be displayed in public;
228 (ix) covered data that reveals an individual’s financial account number, or credit or
229 debit card number, with or without any required security code, access code, personal
230 identification number or password, that would permit access to an individual’s financial account,
231 or information that describes or reveals the income level or bank account balances of an
232 individual;
233 (x) covered data that reveals account or device log-in credentials, or security or
234 access codes for an account or device;
235 (xi) covered data that reveals an individual’s private communications such as
236 voicemails, emails, texts, direct messages, or mail, or information identifying the parties to such
237 communications, voice communications, video communications, and any information that
238 pertains to the transmission of such communications, including telephone numbers called,
239 telephone numbers from which calls were placed, the time calls were made, call duration, and
240 location information of the parties to the call, unless the covered entity or a service provider
241 acting on behalf of the covered entity is the sender or an intended recipient of the
242 communication. Communications are not private for purposes of this clause if such
243 communications are made from or to a device provided by an employer to an employee insofar
244 as such employer provides conspicuous notice that such employer may access such
245 communications;
13 of 64

246 (xii) covered data that reveals calendar information, address book information, phone
247 or text logs, photos, audio recordings, or videos, maintained for private use by an individual,
248 regardless of whether such information is stored on the individual’s device or is accessible from
249 that device and is backed up in a separate location. Such information is not sensitive for purposes
250 of this paragraph if such information is sent from or to a device provided by an employer to an
251 employee insofar as such employer provides conspicuous notice that it may access such
252 information.
253 (xiii) a photograph, film, video recording, or other similar medium that shows the
254 naked or undergarment-clad private area of an individual;
255 (xiv) covered data that reveals the video content requested or selected by an individual
256 collected by a covered entity. This clause does not include covered data used solely for transfers
257 for independent video measurement.
258 (xv) covered data that reveals an individual’s online activities over time and across
259 third-party websites or online services.
260 (xvi) any other covered data collected, processed, or transferred for the purpose of
261 identifying the types of covered data listed in clauses (i) through (xv), inclusive.
262 (30) “service provider”, a person or entity that:
263 (i) collects, processes, or transfers covered data on behalf of, and at the direction of,
264 a covered entity or a government agency; and
265 (ii) receives covered data from or on behalf of a covered entity or a government
266 agency.
14 of 64

267 A service provider that receives service provider data from another service provider as
268 permitted under this chapter shall be treated as a service provider under this chapter with respect
269 to such data.
270 (31) “service provider data”, covered data that is collected or processed by or has been
271 transferred to a service provider by or on behalf of a covered entity or a government agency or
272 another service provider for the purpose of allowing the service provider to whom such covered
273 data is transferred to perform a service or function on behalf of, and at the direction of, such
274 covered entity or government agency.
275 (32) “targeted advertising”, presenting to an individual or device identified by a unique
276 identifier, or groups of individuals or devices identified by unique identifiers, an online
277 advertisement that is selected based on known or predicted preferences, characteristics, or
278 interests associated with the individual or a device identified by a unique identifier; provided,
279 however, that “targeted advertising” does not include:
280 (i) advertising or marketing to an individual or an individual’s device in response to
281 the individual’s specific request for information or feedback;
282 (ii) contextual advertising, which is when an advertisement is displayed based on the
283 content with or in which the advertisement appears and does not vary based on who is viewing
284 the advertisement; or
285 (iii) processing covered data strictly necessary for the sole purpose of measuring or
286 reporting advertising or content performance, reach, or frequency, including independent
287 measurement.
15 of 64

288 (33) “third party”, any person or entity, including a covered entity, that
289 (i) collects, processes, or transfers covered data and is not a consumer-facing
290 business with which the individual linked or reasonably linkable to such covered data expects
291 and intends to interact; and
292 (ii) is not a service provider with respect to such data.
293 This term does not include a person or entity that collects covered data from another
294 entity if the two entities are related by common ownership or corporate control, but only if a
295 reasonable consumer’s reasonable expectation would be that such entities share information.
296 (34) “third party data”, covered data that has been transferred to a third party.
297 (35) “transfer”, to disclose, sell, release, disseminate, make available, license, rent, or
298 share covered data orally, in writing, electronically, or by any other means.
299 (36) “unique identifier”, an identifier to the extent that such identifier is reasonably
300 linkable to an individual or device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to 1 or more
301 individuals, including a device identifier, Internet Protocol address, cookie, beacon, pixel tag,
302 mobile ad identifier, or similar technology, customer number, unique pseudonym, user alias,
303 telephone number, or other form of persistent or probabilistic identifier that is linked or
304 reasonably linkable to an individual or device. This term does not include an identifier assigned
305 by a covered entity for the specific purpose of giving effect to an individual’s exercise of consent
306 or opt-outs of the collection, processing, and transfer of covered data pursuant to this chapter or
307 otherwise limiting the collection, processing, or transfer of such information.
16 of 64

308 (37) “widely distributed media”, information that is available to the general public,
309 including information from a telephone book or online directory, a television, internet, or radio
310 program, the news media, or an internet site that is available to the general public on an
311 unrestricted basis, but does not include an obscene visual depiction, as defined in 18 U.S.C.
312 section 1460.
313 Section 2. Duty of Loyalty
314 (a) A covered entity or service provider may not collect, process, or transfer covered data
315 unless the collection, processing, or transfer is limited to what is reasonably necessary and
316 proportionate to carry out one of the following purposes:
317 (1) provide or maintain a specific product or service requested by the individual to whom
318 the data pertains;
319 (2) initiate, manage, complete a transaction, or fulfill an order for specific products or
320 services requested by an individual, including any associated routine administrative, operational,
321 and account-servicing activity such as billing, shipping, delivery, storage, and accounting;
322 (3) authenticate users of a product or service;
323 (4) fulfill a product or service warranty;
324 (5) prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to a security incident. For purposes of this
325 paragraph, security is defined as network security and physical security and life safety, including
326 an intrusion or trespass, medical alerts, fire alarms, and access control security;
327 (6) to prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to fraud, harassment, or illegal activity
328 targeted at or involving the covered entity or its services. For purposes of this paragraph, the
17 of 64

329 term “illegal activity”, a violation of a federal, state, or local law punishable as a felony or
330 misdemeanor that can directly harm;
331 (7) comply with a legal obligation imposed by state or federal law, or to investigate,
332 establish, prepare for, exercise, or defend legal claims involving the covered entity or service
333 provider;
334 (8) effectuate a product recall pursuant to state or federal law;
335 (9) conduct a public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research project
336 that:
337 (i) is in the public interest; and
338 (ii) adheres to all relevant laws and regulations governing such research, including
339 regulations for the protection of human subjects, or is excluded from criteria of the institutional
340 review board;
341 (10) deliver a communication that is not an advertisement to an individual, if the
342 communication is reasonably anticipated by the individual within the context of the individual’s
343 interactions with the covered entity;
344 (11) deliver a communication at the direction of an individual between such individual
345 and one or more individuals or entities;
346 (12) ensure the data security and integrity of covered data in accordance with chapter
347 93H; or
18 of 64

348 (13) transfer assets to a third party in the context of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or
349 similar transaction when the third party assumes control, in whole or in part, of the covered
350 entity’s assets, only if the covered entity, in a reasonable time prior to such transfer, provides
351 each affected individual with:
352 (i) a notice describing such transfer, including the name of the entity or entities receiving
353 the individual’s covered data and their privacy policies; and
354 (ii) a reasonable opportunity to withdraw any previously given consents related to the
355 individual’s covered data and a reasonable opportunity to request the deletion of the individual’s
356 covered data.
357 (b) A covered entity or service provider may, with respect to covered data previously
358 collected in accordance with the previous subsection, process such data:
359 (1) as necessary to provide advertising or marketing of products or services provided by
360 the covered entity to an individual who is not a minor or device by electronic or non-electronic
361 means, provided that the delivery of such advertising or marketing complies with the
362 requirements of this chapter;
363 (2) process such data as necessary to perform system maintenance or diagnostics;
364 (3) develop, maintain, repair, or enhance a product or service for which such data was
365 collected;
366 (4) to conduct internal research or analytics to improve a product or service for which
367 such data was collected;
368 (5) perform inventory management or reasonable network management;
19 of 64

369 (6) protect against spam; or
370 (7) debug or repair errors that impair the functionality of a service or product for which
371 such data was collected.
372 (c) A covered entity or service provider shall not:
373 (1) engage in deceptive advertising or marketing with respect to a product or service
374 offered to an individual; or
375 (2) draw an individual into signing up for or acquiring a product or service through:—
376 (i) the use of any false, fictitious, fraudulent, or materially misleading statement or
377 representation; or
378 (ii) the use of a dark pattern or deceptive design.
379 (d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or interpreted to:
380 (1) limit or diminish free speech rights of covered entities guaranteed under the First
381 Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or under Article 16 of Massachusetts
382 Declaration of Rights; or
383 (2) imply any purpose that is not enumerated in subsections (a) and (b), when applicable.
384 Section 3. Sensitive Covered Data
385 (a) A covered entity or service provider shall not:
386 (1) collect, process, or transfer a Social Security number, except when necessary to
387 facilitate an extension of credit, authentication, fraud and identity fraud detection and prevention,
20 of 64

388 the payment or collection of taxes, the enforcement of a contract between parties, or the
389 prevention, investigation, or prosecution of fraud or illegal activity, or as otherwise required by
390 state or federal law;
391 (2) collect or process sensitive covered data, except where such collection or processing
392 is strictly necessary to provide or maintain a specific product or service requested by the
393 individual to whom the covered data pertains or is strictly necessary to effect a purpose
394 enumerated in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (5), (7), (9), (10), (11), (13), of subsection (a) of section 2,
395 and such data is only used for that purposes;
396 (3) transfer an individual’s sensitive covered data to a third party, unless:
397 (i) the transfer is made pursuant to the consent of the individual, given before each
398 specific transfer takes place;
399 (ii) the transfer is necessary to comply with a legal obligation imposed by state or federal
400 law, so long as such obligation preexisted the collection and previous notice of such obligation
401 was provided to the individual to whom the data pertains;
402 (iii) the transfer is necessary to prevent an individual from imminent injury where the
403 covered entity believes in good faith that the individual is at risk of death, serious physical
404 injury, or serious health risk;
405 (iv) in the case of the transfer of a password, the transfer is necessary to use a designated
406 password manager or is to a covered entity for the exclusive purpose of identifying passwords
407 that are being reused across sites or accounts;
21 of 64

408 (v) in the case of the transfer of genetic information, the transfer is necessary to perform a
409 medical diagnosis or medical treatment specifically requested by an individual, or to conduct
410 medical research in accordance with federal and state law; or
411 (vi) in the case of transfer assets in case of a merger, if the transfer is made in accordance
412 with paragraph (13) of subsection (a) of section (2); or
413 (4) process sensitive covered data for the purposes of targeted advertising.
414 Section 4. Data Subject Rights
415 (a) A covered entity shall provide an individual, after receiving a verified request from
416 the individual, with the right to:
417 (1) access:
418 (i) in a human-readable format that a reasonable individual can understand and download
419 from the internet and transmit freely, the covered data (except covered data in a back-up or
420 archival system) of the individual making the request that is collected, processed, or transferred
421 by the covered entity or any service provider of the covered entity within the 12 months
422 preceding the request;
423 (ii) the categories of any third party or service provider, if applicable, and an option for
424 consumers to obtain the names of any such third party as well as and the categories of any
425 service providers to whom the covered entity has transferred the covered data of the individual,
426 as well as the categories of sources from which the covered data was collected; and
427 (iii) a description of the purpose for which the covered entity transferred the covered data
428 of the individual to a third party or service provider;
22 of 64

429 (2) correct any verifiable substantial inaccuracy or substantially incomplete information
430 with respect to the covered data of the individual that is processed by the covered entity and
431 instruct the covered entity to make reasonable efforts to notify all third parties or service
432 providers to which the covered entity transferred such covered data of the corrected information;
433 (3) delete covered data of the individual that is processed by the covered entity and
434 instruct the covered entity to make reasonable efforts to notify all third parties or service
435 provider to which the covered entity transferred such covered data of the individual’s deletion
436 request; and
437 (4) to the extent technically feasible, export to the individual or directly to another entity
438 the covered data of the individual that is processed by the covered entity, including inferences
439 linked or reasonably linkable to the individual but not including other derived data, without
440 licensing restrictions that limit such transfers in:
441 (i) a human-readable format that a reasonable individual can understand and download
442 from the internet and transmit freely; and
443 (ii) a portable, structured, interoperable, and machine-readable format.
444 (b) A covered entity may not condition, effectively condition, attempt to condition, or
445 attempt to effectively condition the exercise of a right described in subsection (a) through:
446 (1) the use of any false, fictitious, fraudulent, or materially misleading statement or
447 representation; or
448 (2) the use of any dark pattern or deceptive design.
23 of 64

449 (c) Subject to subsections (d) and (e), each request under subsection (a) shall be
450 completed within 45 days of such request from an individual, unless it is demonstrably
451 impracticable or impracticably costly to verify such individual’s request.
452 (d)A response period set forth in this subsection may be extended once by 20 additional
453 days when reasonably necessary, considering the complexity and number of the individual’s
454 requests, so long as the covered entity informs the individual of any such extension within the
455 initial 45-day response period, together with the reason for the extension.
456 (e) A covered entity:
457 (1) shall provide an individual with the opportunity to exercise each of the rights
458 described in subsection (a) and with respect to:
459 (i) the first two times that an individual exercises any right described in subsection (a) in
460 any 12-month period, shall allow the individual to exercise such right free of charge; and
461 (ii) any time beyond the initial two times described in subparagraph (i), may allow the
462 individual to exercise such right for a reasonable fee for each request.
463 (f) A covered entity may not permit an individual to exercise a right described in
464 subsection (a), in whole or in part, if the covered entity:
465 (1) cannot reasonably verify that the individual making the request to exercise the right is
466 the individual whose covered data is the subject of the request or an agent authorized to make
467 such a request on the individual’s behalf;
468 (2) reasonably believes that the request is made to interfere with a contract between the
469 covered entity and another individual;
24 of 64

470 (3) determines that the exercise of the right would require access to or correction of
471 another individual’s sensitive covered data;
472 (4) reasonably believes that the exercise of the right would require the covered entity to
473 engage in an unfair or deceptive practice under state law; or
474 (5) reasonably believes that the request is made to further fraud, support criminal activity,
475 or the exercise of the right presents a data security threat.
476 (g) If a covered entity cannot reasonably verify that a request to exercise a right described
477 in subsection (a) is made by the individual whose covered data is the subject of the request, the
478 covered entity:
479 (1) may request that the individual making the request to exercise the right provide any
480 additional information necessary for the sole purpose of verifying the identity of the individual;
481 and
482 (2) may not process or transfer such additional information for any other purpose.
483 (h) A covered entity may decline, with adequate explanation to the individual, to comply
484 with a request to exercise a right described in subsection (a), in whole or in part, that would:
485 (1) require the covered entity to retain any covered data collected for a single, one-time
486 transaction, if such covered data is not processed or transferred by the covered entity for any
487 purpose other than completing such transaction;
488 (2) be demonstrably impracticable or prohibitively costly to comply with, and the
489 covered entity shall provide a description to the requestor detailing the inability to comply with
490 the request;
25 of 64

491 (3) require the covered entity to attempt to re-identify any de-identified data;
492 (4) require the covered entity to either maintain covered data in an identifiable form or to
493 collect, retain, or access any data in order to be capable of associating a verified individual
494 request with covered data of such individual;
495 (5) result in the release of trade secrets or other privileged or confidential business
496 information;
497 (6) require the covered entity to correct any covered data that cannot be reasonably
498 verified as being inaccurate or incomplete;
499 (7) interfere with law enforcement, judicial proceedings, investigations, or reasonable
500 efforts to guard against, detect, prevent, or investigate fraudulent, malicious, or unlawful activity,
501 or enforce valid contracts;
502 (8) violate state or federal law or the rights and freedoms of another individual, including
503 under the Constitution of the United States and Massachusetts Declaration of Rights;
504 (9) prevent a covered entity from being able to maintain a confidential record of deletion
505 requests, maintained solely for the purpose of preventing covered data of an individual from
506 being recollected after the individual submitted a deletion request and requested that the covered
507 entity no longer collect, process, or transfer such data; or
508 (10) endanger the source of the data if such data could only have been obtained from a
509 single identified source.
510 (i) A covered entity may decline, with adequate explanation to the individual, to comply
511 with a request for deletion pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (a) if such request:
26 of 64

512 (1) unreasonably interferes with the provision of products or services by the covered
513 entity to another person it currently serves;
514 (2) requests to delete covered data that relates to (A) a public figure, public official, or
515 limited-purpose public figure; or (B) any other individual that has no reasonable expectation of
516 privacy with respect to such data;
517 (3) requests to delete covered data reasonably necessary to perform a contract between
518 the covered entity and the individual;
519 (4) requests to delete covered data that the covered entity needs to retain in order to
520 comply with professional ethical obligations;
521 (5) requests to delete covered data that the covered entity reasonably believes may be
522 evidence of unlawful activity or an abuse of the covered entity’s products or service; or
523 (6) is directed to a consumer reporting agency, as defined in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(f) and
524 targets covered data that is used for the purpose of evaluating a consumer’s creditworthiness,
525 credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics or mode of
526 living, subject to and strictly maintained in accordance with, the provisions of the Fair Credit
527 Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq.
528 (j) In a circumstance that would allow a denial pursuant to this section, a covered entity
529 shall partially comply with the remainder of the request if it is possible and not unduly
530 burdensome to do so.
531 (k) The receipt of a large number of verified requests, on its own, may not be considered
532 to render compliance with a request demonstrably impracticable.
27 of 64

533 (l) A covered entity shall facilitate the ability of individuals to make requests under
534 subsection (a) in any language in which the covered entity provides a product or service. The
535 mechanisms by which a covered entity enables individuals to make requests under subsection (a)
536 shall be readily accessible and usable by individuals with disabilities. Such mechanisms shall, at
537 a minimum, be accessible in the same or a similar location as the privacy policies required by
538 section 9 of this chapter.
539 Section 5. Consent Practices
540 (a) The requirements of this chapter with respect to a request for consent from a covered
541 entity or service provider to an individual are the following:
542 (1) The request for consent shall be provided to the individual in a clear and conspicuous
543 standalone disclosure made through the primary medium used to offer the covered entity’s
544 product or service, or, in the case that the product or service is not offered in a medium that does
545 permits the making of the request under this paragraph, another medium regularly used in
546 conjunction with the covered entity’s product or service;
547 (2) The request includes a description of the processing purpose for which the
548 individual’s consent is sought by:
549 (i) clearly stating the specific categories of covered data that the covered entity shall
550 collect, process, and transfer necessary to effectuate the processing purpose; and
551 (ii) including a prominent heading and is reasonably understandable so that an individual
552 can identify and understand the processing purpose for which consent is sought and the covered
553 data to be collected, processed, or transferred by the covered entity for such processing purpose;
28 of 64

554 (3) The request clearly explains the individual’s applicable rights related to consent;
555 (4) The request is made in a manner reasonably accessible to and usable by individuals
556 with disabilities;
557 (5) The request is made available to the individual in each covered language in which the
558 covered entity provides a product or service for which authorization is sought;
559 (6) The option to refuse consent shall be at least as prominent as the option to accept, and
560 the option to refuse consent shall take the same number of steps or fewer as the option to accept;
561 (7)Processing or transferring any covered data collected pursuant to consent for a
562 different processing purpose than that for which consent was obtained shall require consent for
563 the subsequent processing purpose;
564 (8)The request for consent must be displayed at or before the point of collection; and
565 (9) The request must be accompanied by a copy of the covered entity’s or service
566 provider’s privacy policy subject to the requirements of section 9, which may be included with
567 the request as a hyperlink, and, if the covered entity is a large data holder, shall also include the
568 short form privacy policy as required by subsection (h) of section 9.
569 (b) A covered entity shall not infer that an individual has provided consent to a practice
570 from the inaction of the individual or the individual’s continued use of a service or product
571 provided by the covered entity.
572 (c)A covered entity shall not obtain or attempt to obtain the consent of an individual
573 through:
29 of 64

574 (1) the use of any false, fictitious, fraudulent, or materially misleading statement or
575 representation;
576 (2) the use of any dark pattern or deceptive design; or
577 (3) conditioning or limiting access to an individual’s account.
578 Section 6. Privacy by Design
579 (a) A covered entity or service provider shall establish, implement, and maintain
580 reasonable policies, practices, and procedures that reflect the role of the covered entity or service
581 provider in the collection, processing, and transferring of covered data and that:
582 (1 ) consider applicable federal and state laws, rules, or regulations related to covered
583 data the covered entity or service provider collects, processes, or transfers;
584 (2) identify, assess, and mitigate privacy risks related to minors;
585 (3) mitigate privacy risks related to the products and services of the covered entity or the
586 service provider, including in the design, development, and implementation of such products and
587 services, considering the role of the covered entity or service provider and the information
588 available to it;
589 (4) evaluate the length of time that covered data shall be retained and circumstances
590 under which covered data shall be deleted, de-identified, or otherwise modified with respect to
591 the purposes for which it was collected or processed and the sensitivity of the covered data; and
592 (5) implement reasonable training and safeguards within the covered entity and service
593 provider to promote compliance with all privacy laws applicable to covered data the covered
30 of 64

594 entity collects, processes, or transfers or covered data the service provider collects, processes, or
595 transfers on behalf of the covered entity and mitigate privacy risks taking into account the role of
596 the covered entity or service provider and the information available to it.
597 (b)The policies, practices, and procedures established by a covered entity or service
598 provider under subsection (a), shall correspond with, as applicable:
599 (1) the size of the covered entity or the service provider and the nature, scope, and
600 complexity of the activities engaged in by the covered entity or service provider, including
601 whether the covered entity or service provider is a large data holder, nonprofit organization,
602 small business, third party, or data broker, considering the role of the covered entity or service
603 provider and the information available to it;
604 (2) the sensitivity of the covered data collected, processed, or transferred by the covered
605 entity or service provider;
606 (3)the volume of covered data collected, processed, or transferred by the covered entity
607 or service provider;
608 (4)the number of individuals and devices to which the covered data collected, processed,
609 or transferred by the covered entity or service provider relates; and
610 (5)the cost of implementing such policies, practices, and procedures in relation to the
611 risks and nature of the covered data.
612 Section 7. Pricing
613 (a) A covered entity may not retaliate against an individual for:
31 of 64

614 (1) exercising any of the rights guaranteed by this chapter, or any regulations
615 promulgated under this chapter; or
616 (2) refusing to agree to collection or processing of covered data for a separate product or
617 service, including denying goods or services, charging different prices or rates for goods or
618 services, or providing a different level of quality of goods or services.
619 (b) Nothing in subsection (a) shall be construed to:
620 (1) prohibit the relation of the price of a service or the level of service provided to an
621 individual to the provision, by the individual, of financial information that is necessarily
622 collected and processed only for the purpose of initiating, rendering, billing for, or collecting
623 payment for a service or product requested by the individual;
624 (2) prohibit a covered entity from offering a different price, rate, level, quality or
625 selection of goods or services to an individual, including offering goods or services for no fee, if
626 the offering is in connection with an individual’s voluntary participation in a bona fide loyalty,
627 rewards, premium features, discount or club card program, provided, that the covered entity may
628 not sell covered data to a third-party as part of such a program unless:
629 (i) the sale is reasonably necessary to enable the third party to provide a benefit to which
630 the consumer is entitled;
631 (ii) the sale of personal data to third parties is clearly disclosed in the terms of the
632 program; and
32 of 64

633 (iii) the third party uses the personal data only for purposes of facilitating such a benefit
634 to which the consumer is entitled and does not retain or otherwise use or disclose the personal
635 data for any other purpose;
636 (3) require a covered entity to provide a bona fide loyalty program that would require the
637 covered entity to collect, process, or transfer covered data that the covered entity otherwise
638 would not collect, process, or transfer;
639 (4) prohibit a covered entity from offering a financial incentive or other consideration to
640 an individual for participation in market research;
641 (5)prohibit a covered entity from offering different types of pricing or functionalities with
642 respect to a product or service based on an individual’s exercise of a right to delete; or
643 (6)prohibit a covered entity from declining to provide a product or service insofar as the
644 collection and processing of covered data is strictly necessary for such product or service.
645 (c) Notwithstanding the provisions in this section, no covered entity may offer different
646 types of pricing that are unjust, unreasonable, coercive, or usurious in nature.
647 Section 8. Civil Rights Protections
648 (a) A covered entity or a service provider may not collect, process, or transfer covered
649 data or publicly available data in a manner that discriminates in or otherwise makes unavailable
650 the equal enjoyment of goods or services (i.e., has a disparate impact) on the basis of race, color,
651 religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, genetic information,
652 pregnancy or a condition related to said pregnancy including, but not limited to, lactation or the
33 of 64

653 need to express breast milk for a nursing child, ancestry or status as a veteran, or any other basis
654 protected by chapter 151B.
655 (b) This subsection shall not apply to:
656 (1) the collection, processing, or transfer of covered data for the purpose of:
657 (i) covered entity’s or a service provider’s self-testing to prevent or mitigate unlawful
658 discrimination; or
659 (ii) diversifying an applicant, participant, or customer pool; or
660 (2) any private club or group not open to the public, as described in section 201(e) of the
661 Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. section 2000a(e).
662 (c) Whenever the Attorney General obtains information that a covered entity or service
663 provider may have collected, processed, or transferred covered data in violation of subsection
664 (a), the Attorney General shall initiate enforcement actions relating to such violation in
665 accordance with section 12 of this chapter.
666 (1) Not later than 3 years after the date of enactment of this chapter, and annually no
667 later than December 31 of each year thereafter, the Attorney General shall submit to the joint
668 committee on ways and means, the joint committee on racial equity, civil rights, and inclusion,
669 and the joint committee on advanced information technology, the internet and cybersecurity a
670 report that includes a summary of the enforcement actions taken under this subsection.
671 Section 9. Privacy Policy
34 of 64

672 (a) Each covered entity or service provider shall make publicly available, in a clear and
673 conspicuous location on its homepage, a reasonably understandable and not misleading privacy
674 policy that provides a detailed and accurate representation of the data collection, processing, and
675 transfer activities of the covered entity or service provider.
676 (b)The privacy policy must be provided in a manner that is reasonably accessible to and
677 usable by individuals with disabilities. The policy shall be made available to the public in each
678 covered language in which the covered entity or service provider provides a product or service
679 that is subject to the privacy policy; or carries out activities related to such product or service.
680 (c) The privacy policy must include, at a minimum:
681 (1) The identity and the contact information of:
682 (i) the covered entity or service provider to which the privacy policy applies, including
683 the covered entity’s or service provider’s points of contact and generic electronic mail addresses,
684 as applicable for privacy and data security inquiries;
685 (ii) any other entity within the same corporate structure as the covered entity or service
686 provider to which covered data is transferred by the covered entity;
687 (2) the categories of covered data the covered entity or service provider collects or
688 processes;
689 (3) the processing purposes for each category of covered data the covered entity or
690 service provider collects or processes;
691 (4) whether the covered entity or service provider transfers covered data and, if so, each
692 category of service provider and third party to which the covered entity or service provider
35 of 64

693 transfers covered data, the name of each data broker to which the covered entity or service
694 provider transfers covered data, and the purposes for which such data is transferred to such
695 categories of service providers and third parties or third-party collecting entities, except for a
696 transfer to a governmental entity pursuant to a court order or law that prohibits the covered entity
697 or service provider from disclosing such transfer;
698 (5) The length of time the covered entity or service provider intends to retain each
699 category of covered data, including sensitive covered data, or, if it is not possible to identify that
700 timeframe, the criteria used to determine the length of time the covered entity or service provider
701 intends to retain categories of covered data;
702 (6) A prominent, clear, and reasonably understandable description of how an individual
703 can exercise the rights described in this chapter;
704 (7) A general description of the covered entity’s or service provider’s data security
705 practices; and
706 (8) The effective date of the privacy policy.
707 (d) If a covered entity or service provider makes a material change to its privacy policy or
708 practices, the covered entity or service provider shall notify each individual affected by such
709 material change before implementing the material change with respect to any prospectively
710 collected covered data and, except as provided in paragraphs (1) through (13) of section 2,
711 subsection (a), provide a reasonable opportunity for each individual to withdraw consent to any
712 further materially different collection, processing, or transfer of previously collected covered
713 data under the changed policy.
36 of 64

714 (e) A covered entity or service provider shall take all reasonable electronic measures to
715 provide direct notification regarding material changes to the privacy policy to each affected
716 individual, in each covered language in which the privacy policy is made available, and taking
717 into account available technology and the nature of the relationship.
718 (f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the requirements for covered
719 entities or service providers under other sections of this chapter.
720 (g) Each large data holder shall retain copies of previous versions of its privacy policy for
721 at least 10 years beginning after the date of enactment of this chapter and publish them on its
722 website. Such large data holder shall make publicly available, in a clear, conspicuous, and
723 readily accessible manner, a log describing the date and nature of each material change to its
724 privacy policy over the past 10 years. The descriptions shall be sufficient for a reasonable
725 individual to understand the material effect of each material change. The obligations in this
726 paragraph shall not apply to any previous versions of a large data holder’s privacy policy, or any
727 material changes to such policy, that precede the date of enactment of this Act.
728 (h) In addition to the privacy policy required under subsection (a), a large data holder that
729 is a covered entity shall provide a short form notice of no more than 500 words in length that
730 includes the main features of their data practices.
731 (i) Each covered entity or service provider that collects, processes, or transfers biometric
732 data shall provide a separate privacy policy detailing the collection, processing, and transfer of
733 such biometric data, subject to the provisions of subsections (a) through (h) of this section.
734 (j)Each covered entity or service provider that collects, processes, or transfers specific
735 precise geolocation information shall provide a separate privacy policy detailing the collection,
37 of 64

736 processing, and transfer of such precise geolocation information, subject to the provisions of
737 subsections (a) through (h) of this section.
738 Section 10. Advanced Data Rights
739 (a) A covered entity or service provider shall provide an individual with a clear and
740 conspicuous, easy-to-execute means to withdraw consent. Those means shall be at least as easy
741 to execute by an individual as the means to provide consent and shall, at a minimum, be
742 accessible in the same or a substantially similar location as the privacy policies required by
743 section 9.
744 (b) Right to opt out of covered data transfers. A covered entity:
745 (1) may not transfer or direct the transfer of the covered data of an individual to a
746 third party if the individual or an agent authorized to make such a request on the individual’s
747 behalf objects to the transfer; and
748 (2) shall allow an individual to object to such a transfer through an opt out
749 mechanism, at a minimum, accessible in the same or a substantially similar location as the
750 privacy policies required by section 9.
751 (c) Right to opt out of targeted advertising. A covered entity or service provider that
752 directly delivers a targeted advertisement shall:
753 (1) prior to engaging in targeted advertising to an individual or device and at all
754 times, thereafter, provide such individual with a clear and conspicuous means to opt out of
755 targeted advertising;
38 of 64

756 (2) abide by any opt out designation by an individual or an agent authorized to make
757 such a request on the individual’s behalf with respect to targeted advertising and notify the
758 covered entity that directed the service provider to deliver the targeted advertisement of the opt
759 out decision; and
760 (3) allow an individual to make an opt out designation with respect to targeted
761 advertising through an opt out mechanism, at a minimum, accessible in the same or a
762 substantially similar location as the privacy policies required by section 9.
763 (d) Right to opt out of profiling. A covered entity or service provider that engages in
764 profiling in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects
765 on an individual shall:
766 (1) provide such individual with a clear and conspicuous means to opt out of such
767 profiling; and
768 (2) allow an individual to object to such profiling through an opt out mechanism, at a
769 minimum, accessible in the same or a substantially similar location as the privacy policies
770 required by section 9.
771 (e) A covered entity or service provider that receives an opt out notification pursuant
772 to this section shall abide by such opt out designations in a commercially reasonable timeframe.
773 Such covered entity or service provider shall notify any other person that directed the covered
774 entity or service provider to either serve, deliver, or otherwise process targeted advertisements or
775 to engage in profiling in furtherance of automated decisions of the individual's opt out decision
776 within a commercially reasonable timeframe.
39 of 64

777 (f) A covered entity or service provider may not condition, effectively condition,
778 attempt to condition, or attempt to effectively condition the exercise of any individual right under
779 this section through:
780 (1) the use of any false, fictitious, fraudulent, or materially misleading statement or
781 representation; or
782 (2) the use of a dark pattern or deceptive design.
783 (g) A covered entity shall notify third parties who had access to an individual’s
784 covered data when the individual exercises any of the rights established in this section. The third
785 party shall comply with the request to opt out of sale or data transfer forwarded to them from a
786 covered entity that provided, made available, or authorized the collection of the individual’s
787 covered data. The third party shall comply with the request in the same way a covered entity is
788 required to comply with the request. The third party shall no longer retain, use, or disclose the
789 personal information unless the third party becomes a service provider or a covered entity in the
790 terms of this chapter.
791 (h) A covered entity that communicates an individual’s opt out request to a third
792 party or service provider pursuant to this section shall not be liable under this chapter if the third
793 party or service provider receiving the opt-out request violates the restrictions set forth in this
794 chapter; provided, however, that at the time of communicating the opt-out request, the covered
795 entity does not know or should not reasonably know that the third party or service provider
796 intends to commit such a violation.
797 (i) If an individual decides to opt out of the processing of the individual’s covered
798 data for the purposes specified in subsections (b), (c), or (d) and such decision conflicts with the
40 of 64

799 individual’s existing, voluntary participation in a covered entity’s bona fide loyalty, rewards,
800 premium features, discounts or club card program, the covered entity shall comply with the
801 individual’s opt out preference signal but may notify the individual of the conflict and provide
802 the individual with the choice to opt back into such processing for participation in such a
803 program; provided, however, that the controller shall not use dark patterns or deceptive design to
804 coerce the individual to opt back into such processing related to that individual’s participation in
805 such program.
806 (j) A covered entity or service provider shall not require an individual to create an
807 account for the purposes of exercising any right under this chapter.
808 Section 11. Service Providers
809 (a)A service provider:
810 (1)shall adhere to the instructions of a covered entity and only collect, process, and
811 transfer service provider data to the extent necessary and proportionate to provide a service
812 requested by the covered entity, as set out in the contract required by subsection (b), and this
813 paragraph does not require a service provider to collect, process, or transfer covered data if the
814 service provider would not otherwise do so;
815 (2)may not collect, process, or transfer service provider data if the service provider has
816 actual knowledge that a covered entity violated this chapter with respect to such data;
817 (3)shall assist a covered entity in responding to a request made by an individual under
818 this chapter, by either:
41 of 64

819 (i)providing appropriate technical and organizational measures, considering the nature of
820 the processing and the information reasonably available to the service provider, for the covered
821 entity to comply with such request for service provider data; or
822 (ii)fulfilling a request by a covered entity to execute an individual rights request that the
823 covered entity has determined should be complied with, by either:
824 (A)complying with the request pursuant to the covered entity’s instructions; or
825 (B)providing written verification to the covered entity that it does not hold covered data
826 related to the request, that complying with the request would be inconsistent with its legal
827 obligations, or that the request falls within an exception under this chapter;
828 (4)may engage another service provider for purposes of processing service provider data
829 on behalf of a covered entity only after providing that covered entity with notice and pursuant to
830 a written contract that requires such other service provider to satisfy the obligations of the
831 service provider with respect to such service provider data, including that the other service
832 provider be treated as a service provider under this chapter;
833 (5)shall, upon the reasonable request of the covered entity, make available to the covered
834 entity information necessary to demonstrate the compliance of the service provider with the
835 requirements of this chapter, which may include making available a report of an independent
836 assessment arranged by the service provider on terms agreed to by the service provider and the
837 covered entity or providing information necessary to enable the covered entity to conduct and
838 document a privacy impact assessment;
42 of 64

839 (6)shall, at the covered entity’s direction, delete or return all covered data to the covered
840 entity as requested at the end of the provision of services, unless retention of the covered data is
841 required by law;
842 (7)shall develop, implement, and maintain reasonable administrative, technical, and
843 physical safeguards that are designed to protect the security and confidentiality of covered data
844 the service provider processes consistent with chapter 93H of the general laws; and
845 (8)shall allow and cooperate with reasonable assessments by the covered entity or the
846 covered entity’s designated assessor. Alternatively, the service provider may arrange for a
847 qualified and independent assessor to conduct an assessment of the service provider’s policies
848 and technical and organizational measures in support of the obligations under this chapter using
849 an appropriate and accepted control standard or framework and assessment procedure for such
850 assessments. The service provider shall provide a report of such assessment to the covered entity
851 upon request.
852 (b)A person or entity may only act as a service provider pursuant to a written contract
853 between the covered entity and the service provider, or a written contract between one service
854 provider and a second service provider as described under paragraph (4) of subsection (a), if the
855 contract:
856 (1)sets forth the data processing procedures of the service provider with respect to
857 collection, processing, or transfer performed on behalf of the covered entity or service provider;
858 (2)clearly sets forth:
859 (i)instructions for collecting, processing, or transferring data;
43 of 64

860 (ii)the nature and purpose of collecting, processing, or transferring;
861 (iii)the type of data subject to collecting, processing, or transferring;
862 (iv)the duration of processing; and
863 (v)the rights and obligations of both parties, including a method by which the service
864 provider shall notify the covered entity of material changes to its privacy practices;
865 (3)does not relieve a covered entity or a service provider of any requirement or liability
866 imposed on such covered entity or service provider under this chapter; and
867 (4)prohibits:
868 (i)collecting, processing, or transferring covered data in contravention to subsection (a);
869 and
870 (ii)combining service provider data with covered data which the service provider receives
871 from or on behalf of another person or persons or collects from the interaction of the service
872 provider with an individual, provided that such combining is not necessary to effectuate a
873 purpose described in paragraphs (1) through (13) of section 2(a) and is otherwise permitted under
874 the contract required by this subsection.
875 (c)Each service provider shall retain copies of previous contracts entered into in
876 compliance with this subsection with each covered entity to which it provides requested products
877 or services.
44 of 64

878 (d)The classification of a person or entity as a covered entity or as a service provider and
879 the relationship between covered entities and service providers are regulated by the following
880 provisions:
881 (1)Determining whether a person is acting as a covered entity or service provider with
882 respect to a specific processing of covered data is a fact-based determination that depends upon
883 the context in which such data is processed.
884 (2)A person or entity that is not limited in its processing of covered data pursuant to the
885 instructions of a covered entity, or that fails to adhere to such instructions, is a covered entity and
886 not a service provider with respect to a specific processing of covered data. A service provider
887 that continues to adhere to the instructions of a covered entity with respect to a specific
888 processing of covered data remains a service provider. If a service provider begins, alone or
889 jointly with others, determining the purposes and means of the processing of covered data, it is a
890 covered entity and not a service provider with respect to the processing of such data.
891 (3)A covered entity that transfers covered data to a service provider or a service provider
892 that transfers covered data to a covered entity or another service provider, in compliance with the
893 requirements of this chapter, is not liable for a violation of this chapter by the service provider or
894 covered entity to whom such covered data was transferred, if at the time of transferring such
895 covered data, the covered entity or service provider did not have actual knowledge that the
896 service provider or covered entity would violate this chapter.
897 (4)A covered entity or service provider that receives covered data in compliance with the
898 requirements of this chapter is not in violation of this chapter as a result of a violation by a
899 covered entity or service provider from which such data was received.
45 of 64

900 (e)A third party:
901 (1)shall not process third party data for a processing purpose other than the processing
902 purpose for which
903 (i)the individual gave consent or to effect a purpose enumerated in paragraph (2), (3), or
904 (5) of subsection (a) of section 2 in the case of sensitive covered data; or
905 (ii)the covered entity made a disclosure pursuant to their privacy policy and in the case of
906 data that is not sensitive covered data; and
907 (2)may reasonably rely on representations made by the covered entity that transferred the
908 third-party data if the third party conducts reasonable due diligence on the representations of the
909 covered entity and finds those representations to be credible.
910 (f)Solely for the purposes of this section, the requirements for service providers to
911 contract with, assist, and follow the instructions of covered entities shall be read to include
912 requirements to contract with, assist, and follow the instructions of a government entity if the
913 service provider is providing a service to a government entity.
914 Section 12. Enforcement
915 (a) A violation of this chapter constitutes an injury to that individual and shall be deemed
916 an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce under chapter 93A,
917 provided that if the court finds for any petitioner, subject to section 9, paragraph (3) of such
918 chapter, recovery under such chapter shall be in the amount of actual damages or $5,000,
919 whichever is higher.
46 of 64

920 (b) Private right of action. Any individual alleging a violation of this chapter by a covered
921 entity, service provider, or third party that is a large data holder may bring a civil action in the
922 superior court or any court of competent jurisdiction.
923 (c) An individual protected by this chapter may not be required, as a condition of service
924 or otherwise, to file an administrative complaint with the attorney general or to accept mandatory
925 arbitration of a claim under this chapter.
926 (d) The civil action shall be directed to the covered entity, service provider, and third-
927 parties alleged to have committed the violation.
928 (e) In a civil action in which the plaintiff prevails, the court may award:
929 (1)liquidated damages of not less than 0.15% of the annual global revenue of the covered
930 entity or $15,000 per violation, whichever is greater;
931 (2)punitive damages; and
932 (3)any other relief, including but not limited to an injunction, that the court deems to be
933 appropriate.
934 (f) In addition to any relief awarded pursuant to the previous paragraph, the court shall
935 award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to any prevailing plaintiff.
936 (g) The Attorney General may bring an action pursuant to section 4 of chapter 93A
937 against a covered entity, service provider, or third party to remedy violations of this chapter and
938 for other relief, including but not limited to an injunction, that may be appropriate, subject to the
939 following:
47 of 64

940 (1) If the court finds that the defendant has employed any method, act, or practice
941 which they knew or should have known to be in violation of this chapter, the court may require
942 the defendant to pay to the commonwealth a civil penalty of:
943 (i) not less than 0.15% of the annual global revenue or $15,000, whichever is greater, per
944 violation; and
945 (ii) not more than 4% of the annual global revenue of the covered entity, service provider,
946 or third-party or $20,000,000, whichever is greater, per action if such action includes multiple
947 violations to multiple individuals;
948 (2) If the court finds that a defendant has engaged in flagrant, willful and repeat
949 violations of this chapter, the court may issue an order to suspend or prohibit a covered entity,
950 service provider, or third party from operating in the commonwealth or collecting, processing,
951 and transferring covered data and any other relief, including but not limited to an injunction, that
952 the court deems to be appropriate.
953 (3) In addition to any penalty or relief awarded under this subsection, a defendant
954 violating this chapter shall also be liable to the commonwealth for the reasonable costs of
955 investigation and litigation of such violation, including reasonable attorneys’ fees and reasonable
956 expert fees.
957 (h) When calculating awards and civil penalties in all the actions in this section, the court
958 shall consider:
959 (1) the number of affected individuals;
960 (2) the severity of the violation or noncompliance;
48 of 64

961 (3) the risks caused by the violation or noncompliance;
962 (4) whether the violation or noncompliance was part of a pattern of noncompliance
963 and violations and not an isolated instance;
964 (5) whether the violation or noncompliance was willful and not the result of error;
965 (6) the precautions taken by the defendant to prevent a violation;
966 (7) the number of administrative actions, lawsuits, settlements, and consent-decrees
967 under this chapter involving the defendant;
968 (8) the number of administrative actions, lawsuits, settlements, and consent-decrees
969 involving the defendant in other states and at the federal level in issues involving information
970 privacy; and
971 (9) the international record of the defendant when it comes to information privacy
972 issues.
973 (i) It is a violation of this chapter for a covered entity or anyone else acting on behalf of a
974 covered entity to retaliate against an individual who makes a good-faith complaint that there has
975 been a failure to comply with any part of this chapter.
976 (1) An injured individual by a violation of the previous paragraph may bring a civil
977 action for monetary damages and injunctive relief in any court of competent jurisdiction.
978 (j) Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind, including a covered entity’s
979 terms of service or a privacy policy, including the short-form privacy notice required under
980 section 9 subsection (h) that purports to waive or limit in any way an individual’s rights under
49 of 64

981 this chapter, including but not limited to any right to a remedy or means of enforcement shall be
982 deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.
983 (k) No private or government action brought pursuant to this chapter shall preclude any
984 other action under this chapter.
985 Section 13. Information Non-applicability
986 (a) This chapter shall not apply to only the following specific types of information:
987 (1) personal information captured from a patient by a health care provider or health
988 care facility or biometric information collected, processed, used, or stored exclusively for
989 medical education or research, public health or epidemiological purposes, health care treatment,
990 insurance, payment, or operations under the federal Health Insurance Portability and
991 Accountability Act of 1996, or to X-ray, roentgen process, computed tomography, MRI, PET
992 scan, mammography, or other image or film of the human anatomy used exclusively to diagnose,
993 prognose, or treat an illness or other medical condition or to further validate scientific testing or
994 screening;
995 (2) nonpublic personal information that is processed by a financial institution subject
996 to, and in compliance with, the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. 6801 et seq., as amended
997 from time to time;
998 (3) personal information regulated by the federal Family Educational Rights and
999 Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. 1232g et seq., as amended from time to time;
1000 (4) individuals sharing their personal contact information such as email addresses
1001 with other individuals in the workplace, or other social, political, or similar settings where the
50 of 64

1002 purpose of the information is to facilitate communication among such individuals, provided that
1003 this chapter shall cover any processing of such contact information beyond interpersonal
1004 communication; or
1005 (5) covered entities’ publication of entity-based member or employee contact
1006 information where such publication is intended to allow members of the public to contact such
1007 member or employee in the ordinary course of the entity’s operations.
1008 (b) For the purpose of this section, the burden of proving that information is exempt
1009 from the provisions of this chapter shall be upon the party claiming the exemption.
1010 Section 14. Implementation
1011 (a) The Attorney General shall adopt rules and regulations for the implementation,
1012 administration, and enforcement of this chapter and may from time to time amend or repeal said
1013 regulations. The rules and regulations shall include but are not limited to:
1014 (1) establishing or adopting baseline technical requirements that determine if a given
1015 dataset has been or can be considered sufficiently de-identified;
1016 (2) establishing reasonable policies, practices, and procedures that satisfy the
1017 requirements set forward in Section 6;
1018 (3) establishing a nonexclusive list of practices that constitute deceptive designs or dark
1019 patterns or otherwise violate the requirements set forward in Section 5; and
1020 (4) further defining when a covered entity is a data broker and additional compliance
1021 requirements for data brokers under this chapter.
51 of 64

1022 (b) The Attorney General may:
1023 (1)gather facts and information applicable to the Attorney General’s obligation to enforce
1024 this chapter and ensure its compliance, consistent with the provisions of section 4 of chapter
1025 93A;
1026 (2) conduct investigations for possible violations of this chapter; and
1027 (3) refer cases for civil enforcement or criminal prosecution to the appropriate federal,
1028 state, or local authorities.
1029 (c) The Attorney General shall, within one year after the effective date of chapter, create
1030 an official internet website that outlines the provisions of this chapter and provides individuals
1031 with a form or other mechanism to report violations of this chapter to the Office of the Attorney
1032 General. The Attorney General shall update the website at least annually. The website shall
1033 include statistics on the Attorney General’s enforcement actions undertaken under this chapter,
1034 broken down by fiscal year, including but not limited to:
1035 (1) number of complaints received;
1036 (2) number of open investigations;
1037 (3) number of closed investigations; and
1038 (4) a summary of case dispositions in which a violation of this chapter occurred.
1039 Section 15. Authorized Agents
1040 (a) An individual may designate another person to serve as the individual’s
1041 authorized agent to exercise the individual’s rights under section 4, to withdraw consent under
52 of 64

1042 section 10, or opt out of the processing of such individual's covered data for one or more of the
1043 purposes specified in section 10.
1044 (b) An individual may designate an authorized agent as provided in subsection (a) by
1045 technological means, including, but not limited to, an Internet link or a browser setting, browser
1046 extension or global device setting that indicates the individual’s intent to opt out processing for
1047 one or more of the purposes specified in section 10.
1048 (c) A covered entity or service provider shall comply with a request received from an
1049 authorized agent if the covered entity or service provider is able to verify the identity of the
1050 individual and the authorized agent's authority to act on such individual’s behalf by the same
1051 means and subject to the same restrictions as a covered entity under section 4(g).
1052 (d) In the case of covered data concerning an individual known to be a child as
1053 defined by the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. 6501, the parent or legal
1054 guardian of such child may exercise the rights provided under this chapter on the child's behalf.
1055 (e) In the case of covered data concerning an individual subject to a guardianship,
1056 conservatorship or other protective arrangement, the guardian or the conservator of the
1057 individual may exercise the rights provided under this chapter on the individual's behalf.
1058 Section 16. Advertising to Minors
1059 (a) A covered entity or service provider may not engage in targeted advertising to any
1060 individual if the covered entity has knowledge that the individual is a minor.
1061 Section 17. Data Brokers
53 of 64

1062 (a)Each data broker shall place a clear, conspicuous, not misleading, and readily
1063 accessible notice on the website or mobile application of the data broker (if the data broker
1064 maintains such a website or mobile application) that:
1065 (1)notifies individuals that the entity is a data broker;
1066 (2)includes a link to the data broker registry website; and
1067 (3)is reasonably accessible to and usable by individuals with disabilities.
1068 (b)Data broker registration. Not later than January 31 of each calendar year that follows a
1069 calendar year during which a covered entity acted as a data broker, data brokers shall register
1070 with the OCABR in accordance with this subsection.
1071 (1)In registering with the OCABR, a data broker shall do the following:
1072 (i)Pay to the OCABR a registration fee of $100;
1073 (ii)Provide the OCABR with the following information:
1074 (A)The legal name and primary physical, email, and internet addresses of the data broker;
1075 (B)A description of the categories of covered data the data broker processes and
1076 transfers;
1077 (C) The contact information of the data broker, including a contact person, a telephone
1078 number, an e-mail address, a website, and a physical mailing address; and
1079 (D) A link to a website through which an individual may easily exercise the rights
1080 provided under this subsection.
54 of 64

1081 (c)The OCABR shall establish and maintain on a website a searchable, publicly available,
1082 central registry of third-party collecting entities that are registered with the OCABR under this
1083 subsection that includes a listing of all registered data brokers and a search feature that allows
1084 members of the public to identify individual data brokers and access to the registration
1085 information provided under subsection (b).
1086 (d)Penalties. A data broker that fails to register or provide the notice as required under
1087 this section shall be subject to enforcement proceedings under section 12.
1088 Section 18. Severability and Relationship to Other Laws
1089 (a) Should any provision of this chapter or part hereof be held under any
1090 circumstances in any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid or unenforceable, such
1091 invalidity or unenforceability shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision
1092 of this or other parts of this chapter.
1093 (b) Nothing in this chapter shall diminish any individual’s rights or obligations under
1094 chapters 66A, 93A, 93H, or under sections 1B or 3B of chapter 214.
1095 SECTION 2. The General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, are hereby
1096 further amended by inserting after chapter 93M the following chapter:
1097 Chapter 93N. Privacy Protections for Location Information Derived from Electronic
1098 Devices
1099 Section 1. Definitions
1100 (a) As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
1101 requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
55 of 64

1102 (1) “Application”, a software program that runs on the operating system of a device.
1103 (2) “Collect”, to obtain, infer, generate, create, receive, or access an individual’s
1104 location information.
1105 (3) “Consent”, freely given, specific, informed, unambiguous, opt-in consent. This
1106 term does not include either of the following: (i) agreement secured without first providing to the
1107 individual a clear and conspicuous disclosure of all information material to the provision of
1108 consent, apart from any privacy policy, terms of service, terms of use, general release, user
1109 agreement, or other similar document; or (ii) agreement obtained through the use of a user
1110 interface designed or manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user
1111 autonomy, decision making, or choice.
1112 (4) “Covered entity”, any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability
1113 company, association, or other group, however organized. A covered entity does not include a
1114 state or local government agency, or any court of Massachusetts, a clerk of the court, or a judge
1115 or justice thereof. A covered entity does not include an individual acting in a non-commercial
1116 context. A covered entity includes all agents of the entity.
1117 (5) “Device”, a mobile telephone, as defined in section 1 of chapter 90 of the general
1118 laws, or any other electronic device that is or may commonly be carried by or on an individual
1119 and is capable of connecting to a cellular, bluetooth, or other wireless network.
1120 (6) “Disclose”, to make location information available to a third party, including but
1121 not limited to by sharing, publishing, releasing, transferring, disseminating, providing access to,
1122 or otherwise communicating such location information orally, in writing, electronically, or by
1123 any other means.
56 of 64

1124 (7) “Individual”, a person located in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
1125 (8) “Location information”, information derived from a device or from interactions
1126 between devices, with or without the knowledge of the user and regardless of the technological
1127 method used, that pertains to or directly or indirectly reveals the present or past geographical
1128 location of an individual or device within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts with sufficient
1129 precision to identify street-level location information within a range of 1,850 feet or less.
1130 Location information includes but is not limited to (i) an internet protocol address capable of
1131 revealing the physical or geographical location of an individual; (ii) Global Positioning System
1132 (GPS) coordinates; and (iii) cell-site location information. This term does not include location
1133 information identifiable or derived solely from the visual content of a legally obtained image,
1134 including the location of the device that captured such image, or publicly posted words.
1135 (9) “Location Privacy Policy”, a description of the policies, practices, and procedures
1136 controlling a covered entity’s collection, processing, management, storage, retention, and
1137 deletion of location information.
1138 (10) “Monetize”, to collect, process, or disclose an individual’s location information
1139 for profit or in exchange for monetary or other consideration. This term includes but is not
1140 limited to selling, renting, trading, or leasing location information.
1141 (11) “Person”, any natural person.
1142 (12) “Permissible purpose”, one of the following purposes: (i) provision of a product,
1143 service, or service feature to the individual to whom the location information pertains when that
1144 individual requested the provision of such product, service, or service feature by subscribing to,
1145 creating an account, or otherwise contracting with a covered entity; (ii) initiation, management,
57 of 64

1146 execution, or completion of a financial or commercial transaction or fulfill an order for specific
1147 products or services requested by an individual, including any associated routine administrative,
1148 operational, and account-servicing activity such as billing, shipping, delivery, storage, and
1149 accounting; (iii) compliance with an obligation under federal or state law; or (iv) response to an
1150 emergency service agency, an emergency alert, a 911 communication, or any other
1151 communication reporting an imminent threat to human life.
1152 (13) “Process”, to perform any action or set of actions on or with location information,
1153 including but not limited to collecting, accessing, using, storing, retaining, analyzing, creating,
1154 generating, aggregating, altering, correlating, operating on, recording, modifying, organizing,
1155 structuring, disposing of, destroying, de-identifying, or otherwise manipulating location
1156 information. This term does not include disclosing location information.
1157 (14) “Reasonably understandable”, of length and complexity such that an individual
1158 with an eighth-grade reading level, as established by the department of elementary and secondary
1159 education, can read and comprehend.
1160 (15) “Service feature”, a discrete aspect of a service provided by a covered entity,
1161 including but not limited to real-time directions, real-time weather, and identity authentication.
1162 (16) "Service provider”, an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability
1163 company, association, or other group, however organized, that collects, processes, or transfers
1164 location information for the sole purpose of, and only to the extent that such service provider is,
1165 conducting business activities on behalf of, for the benefit of, at the direction of, and under
1166 contractual agreement with a covered entity.
58 of 64

1167 (17) “Third party”, any covered entity or person other than (i) a covered entity that
1168 collected or processed location information in accordance with this chapter or its service
1169 providers, or (ii) the individual to whom the location information pertains. This term does not
1170 include government entities.
1171 Section 2. Protection of location information
1172 (a) It shall be unlawful for a covered entity to collect or process an individual’s
1173 location information except for a permissible purpose. Prior to collecting or processing an
1174 individual’s location information for one of those permissible purposes, a covered entity shall
1175 provide the individual with a copy of the Location Privacy Policy and obtain consent from that
1176 individual; provided, however, that this shall not be required when the collection and processing
1177 is done in (1) compliance with an obligation under federal or state law or (2) in response to an
1178 emergency service agency, an emergency alert, a 911 communication, or any other
1179 communication reporting an imminent threat to human life.
1180 (b) If a covered entity collects location information for the provision of multiple
1181 permissible purposes, it shall be mentioned in the Location Privacy Policy and individuals shall
1182 provide discrete consent for each purpose; provided, however, that this shall not be required for
1183 the purpose of collecting and processing location information to comply with an obligation under
1184 federal or state law or to respond to an emergency service agency, an emergency alert, a 911
1185 communication, or any other communication reporting an imminent threat to human life.
1186 (c) A covered entity that directly delivers targeted advertisements as part of its product or
1187 services shall provide individuals with a clear, conspicuous, and simple means to opt out of the
59 of 64

1188 processing of their location information for purposes of selecting and delivering targeted
1189 advertisements.
1190 (d) Consent provided under this section shall expire (1) after one year, (2) when the initial
1191 purpose for processing the information has been satisfied, or (3) when the individual revokes
1192 consent, whichever occurs first, provided that consent may be renewed pursuant to the same
1193 procedures. Upon expiration of consent, any location information possessed by a covered entity
1194 shall be permanently destroyed.
1195 (e) It shall be unlawful for a covered entity or service provider that lawfully collects and
1196 processes location information to:
1197 (1) collect more precise location information than necessary to carry out the
1198 permissible purpose;
1199 (2) retain location information longer than necessary to carry out the permissible
1200 purpose;
1201 (3) sell, rent, trade, or lease location information to third parties; or
1202 (4) derive or infer from location information any data that is not necessary to carry
1203 out a permissible purpose.
1204 (5) disclose, cause to disclose, or assist with or facilitate the disclosure of an
1205 individual’s location information to third parties, unless such disclosure is (i) necessary to carry
1206 out the permissible purpose for which the information was collected, or (ii) requested by the
1207 individual to whom the location data pertains.
60 of 64

1208 (f) It shall be unlawful for a covered entity or service providers to disclose location
1209 information to any federal, state, or local government agency or official unless (1) the agency or
1210 official serves the covered entity or service provider with a valid warrant or establishes the
1211 existence of exigent circumstances that make it impracticable to obtain a warrant, (2) disclosure
1212 is mandated under federal or state law, including in response to a court order or lawfully issued
1213 and properly served subpoena or civil investigative demand under state or federal law, or (3) the
1214 data subject requests such disclosure.
1215 (g) A covered entity shall maintain and make available to the data subject a Location
1216 Privacy Policy, which shall include, at a minimum, the following:
1217 (1) the permissible purpose for which the covered entity is collecting, processing, or
1218 disclosing any location information;
1219 (2) the type of location information collected, including the precision of the data;
1220 (3) the identities of service providers with which the covered entity contracts with
1221 respect to location data;
1222 (4) any disclosures of location data necessary to carry out a permissible purpose and
1223 the identities of the third parties to whom the location information could be disclosed;
1224 (5) whether the covered entity’s practices include the internal use of location
1225 information for purposes of targeted advertisement;
1226 (6) the data management and data security policies governing location information;
1227 and
61 of 64

1228 (7) the retention schedule and guidelines for permanently deleting location
1229 information.
1230 (h) A covered entity in lawful possession of location information shall provide notice to
1231 individuals to whom that information pertains of any change to its Location Privacy Policy at
1232 least 20 business days before the change goes into effect, and shall request and obtain consent
1233 before collecting or processing location information in accordance with the new Location
1234 Privacy Policy.
1235 (i) It shall be unlawful for a government entity to monetize location information.
1236 Section 3: Prohibition Against Retaliation
1237 A covered entity shall not take adverse action against an individual because the
1238 individual exercised or refused to waive any of such individual’s rights under this chapter, unless
1239 location data is essential to the provision of the good, service, or service feature that the
1240 individual requests, and then only to the extent that such data is essential. This prohibition
1241 includes but is not limited to:
1242 (1) refusing to provide a good or service to the individual;
1243 (2) charging different prices or rates for goods or services, including through the use
1244 of discounts or other benefits or imposing penalties; or
1245 (3) providing a different level or quality of goods or services to the individual.
1246 Section 4. Enforcement
62 of 64

1247 (a) A violation of this chapter or a regulation promulgated under this chapter
1248 regarding an individual’s location information constitutes an injury to that individual and shall be
1249 deemed an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce under chapter
1250 93A.
1251 (b) Any individual alleging a violation of this chapter by a covered entity or service
1252 provider may bring a civil action in the superior court or any court of competent jurisdiction;
1253 provided that, venue in the superior court shall be proper in the county in which the plaintiff
1254 resides or was located at the time of any violation.
1255 (c) An individual protected by this chapter shall not be required, as a condition of service
1256 or otherwise, to file an administrative complaint with the attorney general or to accept mandatory
1257 arbitration of a claim arising under this chapter.
1258 (d) In a civil action in which the plaintiff prevails, the court may award (1) actual
1259 damages, including damages for emotional distress, or $5,000 per violation, whichever is greater,
1260 (2) punitive damages; and (3) any other relief, including but not limited to an injunction or
1261 declaratory judgment, that the court deems to be appropriate. The court shall consider each
1262 instance in which a covered entity or service provider collects, processes, or discloses location
1263 information in a manner prohibited by this chapter or a regulation promulgated under this chapter
1264 as constituting a separate violation of this chapter or regulation promulgated under this chapter.
1265 In addition to any relief awarded, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to
1266 any prevailing plaintiff.
63 of 64

1267 (e) The attorney general may bring an action pursuant to section 4 of chapter 93A against
1268 a covered entity or service provider to remedy violations of this chapter and for other relief that
1269 may be appropriate.
1270 (f) Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind, including a covered entity’s
1271 terms of service or policies, including but not limited to the Location Privacy Policy, that
1272 purports to waive or limit in any way an individual’s rights under this chapter, including but not
1273 limited to any right to a remedy or means of enforcement, shall be deemed contrary to state law
1274 and shall be void and unenforceable.
1275 (g) No private or government action brought pursuant to this chapter shall preclude any
1276 other action under this chapter.
1277 Section 5. Implementation
1278 The Attorney General may adopt, amend or repeal rules and regulations for the
1279 implementation, administration, and enforcement of this chapter.
1280 SECTION 3. Location Information Collected Before Effective Date
1281 Location information collected, processed, and stored prior to the effective date of this
1282 Act shall be subject to subsections 2(e)(3), 2(e)(5), and 2(f) of Chapter 93N.
1283 SECTION 4. Effective Date
1284 This Act shall take effect 1 year after enactment.
64 of 64